Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon  Youth Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 276,284,696
(2) Juvenile crime
prevention/diversion..................  $ 18,509,485
(3) Multnomah County
gang services ............................  $ 3,552,991
(4) East Metro Gang
Enforcement Team ................... $ 1,930,958
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 9,368,467
(6) Capital improvements ............... $ 772,725
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,029,866 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon Youth
Authority.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$37,385,204 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth Author-
ity.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 2